Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.230

Violations—Registered agent—Service.

(1) Each licensee or interim permit holder shall name a registered agent to accept service of process for any violation of this chapter or rule adopted under this chapter.

(2) The registered agent may be released at the expiration of one year after the license or interim permit issued under this chapter has expired or been revoked.

(3) Failure to name a registered agent for service of process for violations of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter may be grounds for disciplinary action.

[ 2002 c 310 s 23; 1998 c 142 s 17; 1996 c 200 s 29; 1989 c 198 s 9; 1983 c 39 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.